th: การดูแลรักษาเชือกปีนเขา: เคลือบกันน้ำที่แกนเชือก; แห้ง; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; เคลือบกันน้ำทั้งเส้น; Golden Dry; ไม่มี / มาตรฐาน; เคลือบกันน้ำที่ปลอกเชือก; กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
tr: Tırmanma ipi uygulaması: Kuru çekirdek işlemli; Kuru; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Tam kuru işlemli; Golden Dry; Yok / Standart; Kuru kılıf işlemli; Su itici; Diğer
sk-SK: Ošetrenie lezeckého lana: Impregnované jadro; Impregnované; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Plne impregnované; Golden Dry; Žiadna / štandardná; Impregnovaný oplet; Vodoodpudivé; Iné
el: Επεξεργασία του σχοινιού αναρρίχησης: Ξηρή επεξεργασία πυρήνα; Ξηρό; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Πλήρης ξηρή επεξεργασία; Golden Dry; Καμία / Τυπική; Ξηρή επεξεργασία περιβλήματος; Αδιάβροχο; Άλλο
de: Behandlung des Kletterseils: Kern imprägniert; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Voll imprägniert; Golden Dry; Keine / Standard; Mantel imprägniert; Wasserabweisend; Andere
fr: Finition de la corde d’escalade: Traitement hydrofuge de l’âme; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Traitement Full Dry; Golden Dry; Aucun / standard; Traitement hydrofuge de la gaine; Hydrofuge; Autre
it: variante della corda da arrampicata: Trattamento dry sull'anima; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Trattamento dry completo; Golden Dry; Nessuno / Standard; Trattamento dry sulla calza; Idrorepellente; Altro
ja: クライミングロープの処理: コアドライ加工; ドライ; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; フルドライ加工; Golden Dry; なし/スタンダード; シースドライ加工; 撥水; その他
cs: Ochranná úprava lezeckého lana: Impregnované jádro; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Plně impregnované; Golden Dry; Žádná / Standardní; Impregnovaný oplet; Vodoodpudivé; Jiné
ro-RO: Tratament pentru coarda pentru alpinism: Miez tratat Dry; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Tratat complet Dry; Golden Dry; Fără / Standard; Cămașă tratată Dry; Hidrofug (water repellent); Altele
nb: Håndtering av klatretau: Kjerneimpregnert; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Fullimpregnert; Golden Dry; Ingen / standard; Strømpeimpregnert; Vannavstøtende; Annet
hr-HR: Tretman po užetu za penjanje: Impregnirana jezgra; Impregnirano (Dry); DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Potpuno impregnirano; Golden Dry; Bez impregnacije / standardno; Impregnirana košuljica; Vodoodbojno; Ostalo
zh-TW: 攀岩繩處理方式: 繩芯抗水處理; 抗水; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; 全面抗水處理; Golden Dry; 無 / 標準; 繩鞘抗水處理; 防潑水; 其他
zh-CN: 攀岩绳表面处理: 绳芯防水处理; 防水; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; 全防水处理; Golden Dry; 无/标准; 绳皮防水处理; 防泼水; 其他
bg-BG: Обработка на катерачно въже: Сухо третирана сърцевина; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Пълно сухо третиране; Golden Dry; Няма / Стандартно; Сухо третирана броня; Водоотблъскващо; Други
pt-PT: Tratamento da corda de escalada: Tratamento seco no núcleo; Seco; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Tratamento seco integral; Golden Dry; Nenhum/padrão; Tratamento seco na camisa; Repelente de água; Outro
pl: Impregnacja liny wspinaczkowej: Impregnowany rdzeń; Impregnowana (Dry); DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Pełna impregnacja; Golden Dry; Brak / standardowa; Impregnowany oplot; Hydrofobowa; Inne
sv: Hantering av klätterrep: Torrbehandlad kärna; Torr; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Helt torrbehandlad; Golden Dry; Ingen/standard; Torrbehandlad mantel; Vattenavvisande; Övrigt
en: Climbing rope treatment: Core dry treated; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Full dry treated; Golden Dry; None / Standard; Sheath dry treated; Water repellent; Other
sl-SI: Obdelava plezalne vrvi: Impregnirano jedro; Impregnirano; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Popolnoma impregnirano; Golden Dry; Brez / Standardno; Impregniran plašč; Vodoodbojno; Drugo
ko: 클라이밍 로프 처리 방식: 코어 드라이 처리; 드라이; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; 전체 드라이 처리; Golden Dry; 없음/표준; 외피 드라이 처리; 발수; 기타
nl: Klimtouw behandeling: Geïmpregneerde kern; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Volledig geïmpregneerd; Golden Dry; Geen / standaard; Geïmpregneerde mantel; Waterafstotend; Overig
lt-LT: Laipiojimo virvės apdorojimas: Impregnuota šerdis; Impregnuota („Dry“); DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Visiškai impregnuota; Golden Dry; Nėra / standartinis; Impregnuotas šarvas; Atstumianti vandenį; Kita
pt-BR: Tratamento da corda de escalada: Tratamento dry no núcleo; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Tratamento dry completo; Golden Dry; Nenhum/Padrão; Tratamento dry na capa; Repelente à água; Outros
fi: Kiipeilyköyden käsittely: Kyllästetty ydin; Kyllästetty; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Täysin kyllästetty; Golden Dry; Ei mitään / vakio; Kyllästetty mantteli; Vettähylkivä; Muu
es: Tratamiento de la cuerda de escalada: Tratamiento seco en el núcleo; Seco; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Tratamiento seco completo; Golden Dry; Ninguno / estándar; Tratamiento seco en la funda; Repelente al agua; Otro
hu: Mászókötél kezelése: Impregnált mag; Impregnált; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Teljesen impregnált; Golden Dry; Nincs / Standard; Impregnált köpeny; Vízlepergető; Egyéb
ru: Обработка скалолазной веревки: Водоотталкивающая пропитка сердечника; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Полная водоотталкивающая пропитка; Golden Dry; Нет / стандартная; Водоотталкивающая пропитка оплетки; Водоотталкивающая; Другое
vi: Xử lý dây leo: Xử lý chống nước lõi; Chống nước; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Xử lý chống nước toàn phần; Golden Dry; Không / Tiêu chuẩn; Xử lý chống nước vỏ; Chống thấm nước; Khác
da: Rebets overfladebehandling: Kerne-tørbehandlet; Dry; DryXP; Duratec Dry; Eco Dry; Fuldt tørbehandlet; Golden Dry; Ingen/standard; Strømpe-tørbehandlet; Vandafvisende; Andet